Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3297.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-29-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-29 entitled "Workers’
Compensation — General Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-29-2. Definitions.
In chapters 29 — 38 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Department” means the department of labor and training.
(2) “Director” means the director of labor and training or the director's designee unless
specifically stated otherwise.
(3)(i) “Earnings capacity” means the weekly straight-time earnings that an employee could
receive if the employee accepted an actual offer of suitable alternative employment. Earnings
capacity can also be established by the court based on evidence of ability to earn, including, but not
limited to, a determination of the degree of functional impairment and/or disability, that an
employee is capable of employment. The court may, in its discretion, take into consideration the
performance of the employee’s duty to actively seek employment in scheduling the implementation
of the reduction. The employer need not identify particular employment before the court can direct
an earnings capacity adjustment. In the event that an employee returns to light-duty employment
while partially disabled, an earnings capacity shall not be set based upon actual wages earned until
the employee has successfully worked at light duty for a period of at least thirteen (13) weeks.
(ii) As used under the provisions of this title, “functional impairment” means an anatomical

or functional abnormality existing after the date of maximum medical improvement as determined
by a medically or scientifically demonstrable finding and based upon the sixth (6th) edition of the
American Medical Association’s Guide to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment or comparable
publications of the American Medical Association.
(iii) In the event that an employee returns to employment at an average weekly wage equal
to the employee’s pre-injury earnings exclusive of overtime, the employee will be presumed to
have regained their earning capacity.
(4)(i) “Employee” means any person who has entered into the employment of or works
under contract of service or apprenticeship with any employer, except that in the case of a city or
town other than the city of Providence it shall only mean that class or those classes of employees
as may be designated by a city, town, or regional school district in a manner provided in this chapter
to receive compensation under chapters 29 — 38 of this title.
(ii) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island, or by the Rhode Island airport
corporation, except for sworn employees of the Rhode Island state police, who is otherwise entitled
to the benefits of chapter 19 of title 45 shall be subject to the provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of this
title for case management procedures and dispute resolution by the workers’ compensation court
for all petitions filed on or after July 1, 2025, for the following benefit and disability determinations:
(A) All disputes concerning original liability on matters filed pursuant to § 45-19-1;
(A)(B) The nature and status of disability of the injured employee;
(B)(C) The nature and location of injury relative to the work incident;
(C)(D) Maximum medical improvement (MMI), as it is defined under § 28-33-2(9) 28-29-
2(9);
(D)(E) All issues of legal and/or medical causation;
(E)(F) Suitable alternative employment; and
(F)(G) The assignment of fees and costs pursuant to the provisions of § 28-35-32. The court
may in its discretion appoint an impartial medical examiner in accordance with § 28-33-35. The
court shall hereby be empowered to enforce all of its orders, decrees, and consent agreements of
the parties.
(iii) The term “employee” does not include any individual who is a shareholder or director
in a corporation, general or limited partners in a general partnership, a registered limited liability
partnership, a limited partnership, or partners in a registered limited liability limited partnership, or
any individual who is a member in a limited liability company. These exclusions do not apply to
shareholders, directors, and members who have entered into the employment of or who work under
a contract of service or apprenticeship within a corporation or a limited liability company.
LC006435 - Page 2 of 14

(iv) The term “employee” also does not include a sole proprietor, independent contractor,
or a person whose employment is of a casual nature, and who is employed other than for the purpose
of the employer’s trade or business, or a person whose services are voluntary or who performs
charitable acts, nor shall it include the members of the regularly organized fire and police
departments of any town or city except for appeals from an order of the retirement board filed
pursuant to the provisions of § 45-21.2-9; provided, however, that it shall include the members of
the police and aircraft rescue and firefighting (ARFF) units of the Rhode Island airport corporation.
(v) Whenever a contractor has contracted with the state, a city, town, or regional school
district, any person employed by that contractor in work under contract shall not be deemed an
employee of the state, city, town, or regional school district as the case may be.
(vi) Any person who on or after January 1, 1999, was an employee and became a corporate
officer shall remain an employee, for purposes of these chapters, unless and until coverage under
this act is waived pursuant to § 28-29-8(b) or § 28-29-17. Any person who is appointed a corporate
officer between January 1, 1999, and December 31, 2001, and was not previously an employee of
the corporation, will not be considered an employee, for purposes of these chapters, unless that
corporate officer has filed a notice pursuant to § 28-29-19(c).
(vii) In the case of a person whose services are voluntary or who performs charitable acts,
any benefit received, in the form of monetary remuneration or otherwise, shall be reportable to the
appropriate taxation authority but shall not be deemed to be wages earned under contract of hire
for purposes of qualifying for benefits under chapters 29 — 38 of this title.
(viii) Any reference to an employee who had been injured shall, where the employee is
dead, include a reference to the employee’s dependents as defined in this section, or to the
employee’s legal representatives, or, where the employee is a minor or incompetent, to the
employee’s conservator or guardian.
(ix) A “seasonal occupation” means those occupations in which work is performed on a
seasonal basis of not more than sixteen (16) weeks.
(5) “Employer” includes any person, partnership, corporation, or voluntary association, and
the legal representative of a deceased employer; it includes the state, and the city of Providence. It
also includes each city, town, and regional school district in the state that votes or accepts the
provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of this title in the manner provided in this chapter or is a party to
an appeal from an order of the retirement board filed pursuant to the provisions of § 45-21.2-9.
(6) “General or special employer”:
(i) “General employer” includes but is not limited to temporary help companies and
employee leasing companies and means a person who for consideration and as the regular course
LC006435 - Page 3 of 14

of its business supplies an employee with or without vehicle to another person.
(ii) “Special employer” means a person who contracts for services with a general employer
for the use of an employee, a vehicle, or both.
(iii) Whenever there is a general employer and special employer wherein the general
employer supplies to the special employer an employee and the general employer pays or is
obligated to pay the wages or salaries of the supplied employee, then, notwithstanding the fact that
direction and control is in the special employer and not the general employer, the general employer,
if it is subject to the provisions of the workers’ compensation act or has accepted that act, shall be
deemed to be the employer as set forth in subsection (5) of this section and both the general and
special employer shall be the employer for purposes of §§ 28-29-17 and 28-29-18.
(iv) Effective January 1, 2003, whenever a general employer enters into a contract or
arrangement with a special employer to supply an employee or employees for work, the special
employer shall require an insurer generated insurance coverage certification, on a form prescribed
by the department, demonstrating Rhode Island workers’ compensation and employer’s liability
coverage evidencing that the general employer carries workers’ compensation insurance with that
insurer with no indebtedness for its employees for the term of the contract or arrangement. In the
event that the special employer fails to obtain and maintain at policy renewal and thereafter this
insurer generated insurance coverage certification demonstrating Rhode Island workers’
compensation and employer’s liability coverage from the general employer, the special employer
is deemed to be the employer pursuant to the provisions of this section. Upon the cancellation or
failure to renew, the insurer having written the workers’ compensation and employer’s liability
policy shall notify the certificate holders and the department of the cancellation or failure to renew
and upon notice, the certificate holders shall be deemed to be the employer for the term of the
contract or arrangement unless or until a new certification is obtained.
(7) “Independent contractor” means a person who has filed a notice of designation as
independent contractor with the director pursuant to § 28-29-17.1 or as otherwise found by the
workers’ compensation court.
(8)(i) “Injury” means and refers to personal injury to an employee arising out of and in the
course of the employee’s employment, connected and referable to the employment.
(ii) An injury to an employee while voluntarily participating in a private, group, or
employer-sponsored carpool, vanpool, commuter bus service, or other rideshare program, having
as its sole purpose the mass transportation of employees to and from work shall not be deemed to
have arisen out of and in the course of employment. Nothing in the foregoing provision shall be
held to deny benefits under chapters 29 — 38 and chapter 47 of this title to employees such as
LC006435 - Page 4 of 14

drivers, mechanics, and others who receive remuneration for their participation in the rideshare
program. Provided, that the foregoing provision shall not bar the right of an employee to recover
against an employer and/or driver for tortious misconduct.
(9) “Maximum medical improvement” means a point in time when any medically
determinable physical or mental impairment as a result of injury has become stable and when no
further treatment is reasonably expected to materially improve the condition. Neither the need for
future medical maintenance nor the possibility of improvement or deterioration resulting from the
passage of time and not from the ordinary course of the disabling condition, nor the continuation
of a preexisting condition precludes a finding of maximum medical improvement. A finding of
maximum medical improvement by the workers’ compensation court may be reviewed only where
it is established that an employee’s condition has substantially deteriorated or improved.
(10) “Physician” means medical doctor, surgeon, dentist, licensed psychologist,
chiropractor, osteopath, podiatrist, or optometrist, as the case may be.
(11) “Suitable alternative employment” means employment or an actual offer of
employment that the employee is physically able to perform and will not exacerbate the employee’s
health condition and that bears a reasonable relationship to the employee’s qualifications,
background, education, and training. The employee’s age alone shall not be considered in
determining the suitableness of the alternative employment.
SECTION 2. Sections 28-33-5 and 28-33-41 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-33 entitled
"Workers’ Compensation — Benefits" are hereby amended to read as follows:
28-33-5. Medical services provided by employer.
The employer shall, subject to the choice of the employee as provided in § 28-33-8,
promptly provide for an injured employee any reasonable medical, surgical, dental, optical, or other
attendance or treatment, nurse and hospital service, medicines, crutches, and apparatus for such
period as is necessary, in order to cure, rehabilitate, or relieve the employee from the effects of the
employee’s injury. Irrespective of the date of injury, the liability of the employer for hospital
service rendered under this section to the injured employee shall be the cost to the hospital of
rendering the service at the time the service is rendered. The director, after consultations with
representatives of hospitals, employers, and insurance companies, shall establish administrative
procedures regarding the furnishing and filing of data and the time and method of billing and may
accept as representing the costs for both routine and special services to patients, costs as computed
for the federal Medicare program. Each hospital licensed under chapter 17 of title 23 that renders
services to injured employees under the workers’ compensation act, chapters 29 — 38 of this title,
shall submit and certify to the director, in accordance with requirements of the administrative
LC006435 - Page 5 of 14

procedures established by him or her, its costs for those services. The employer shall also provide
all medical, optical, dental, and surgical appliances and apparatus required to cure or relieve the
employee from the effects of the injury, including, but not limited to, the following: ambulance and
nursing service, eyeglasses, dentures, braces and supports, artificial limbs, crutches, and other
similar appliances; provided, that the employer shall not be liable to pay for or provide hearing aids
or other amplification devices.
28-33-41. Rehabilitation of injured persons.
(a)(1) The department and the workers’ compensation court shall expedite the
rehabilitation of and the return to remunerative employment of all employees who are disabled and
injured and who are subject to chapters 29 — 38 of this title.
(2) Rehabilitation means the prompt provision of appropriate services necessary to restore
an employee who is occupationally injured or diseased to his or her optimum physical, mental,
vocational, and economic usefulness. This may require medical, vocational, and/or reemployment
services to restore an employee who is occupationally disabled as nearly as possible to his or her
pre-injury status. As a procedure, rehabilitation may include three (3) overlapping and interrelated
components:
(i)(A) Medical restorative services. Medical treatment and related services needed to
restore the employee who is occupationally disabled to a state of health as near as possible to that
which existed prior to the occupational injury or disease. These services may include, but are not
limited to, the following: medical, surgical, hospital, nursing services, attendant care, chiropractic
care, physical therapy, occupational therapy, medicines, prostheses, orthoses, other physical
rehabilitation services, including psychosocial services, and reasonable travel expenses incurred in
procuring the services.
(B)(I) Treatment by spiritual means. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require
an employee who, in good faith relies on or is treated by prayer or spiritual means by a duly
accredited practitioner of a well-recognized church, to undergo any medical or surgical treatment,
and weekly compensation benefits may not be suspended or terminated on the grounds that the
employee refuses to accept recommended medical or surgical benefits. The employee shall submit
to all physical examinations as required by chapters 29 — 38 of this title.
(II) However, a private employer, insurer, self-insurer, or group self-insurer may pay or
reimburse an employee for any costs associated with treatment by prayer or spiritual means.
(ii) Vocational restorative services. Vocational services needed to return the employee
with a disability to his or her pre-injury employment or, if that is not possible, to a state of
employability in suitable alternative employment. These services may include, but are not limited
LC006435 - Page 6 of 14

to, the following: psychological and vocational evaluations, counseling, and training.
(iii) Reemployment services. Services used to return the employee who is occupationally
disabled to suitable, remunerative employment as adjudged by his or her functional and vocational
ability at that time.
(b)(1) Any employer or any injured employee with total disability or permanent partial
disability to whom the insurance carrier or certificated employer has paid compensation for a period
of three (3) months or more, and to whom compensation is still being paid, or his or her employer
or insurer may file a petition with the workers’ compensation court requesting approval of a
rehabilitation program or may mutually agree to a rehabilitation program. Determinations shall be
rendered by the workers’ compensation court in accordance with this section and as provided in
chapters 29 — 38 of this title and the rules of practice of the Rhode Island workers’ compensation
court.
(2) Action shall be taken as in the judgment of the workers’ compensation court shall seem
practicable and likely to speed the recovery and rehabilitation of injured workers. However,
rehabilitative services shall be appropriate to the needs and capabilities of injured workers.
(c) Compensation payments shall not be diminished or terminated while the employee is
participating in a rehabilitation program approved by the workers’ compensation court or agreed to
by the parties. Provided, that compensation payments shall be suspended while an injured employee
willfully refuses to participate in a rehabilitation program approved by the workers’ compensation
court or agreed to by the parties. When the employee has completed an approved rehabilitation
program, the rehabilitation provider shall recommend, in the instance of vocational rehabilitation,
an earnings capacity, or in the instance of physical rehabilitation provided or prescribed by a
physician, a degree of functional impairment, and the employee shall be referred to the court for an
earnings capacity adjustment to benefits, unless the employee has returned to gainful employment.
(d) The employer shall bear the expense of rehabilitative services agreed to or ordered
pursuant to this section. If those rehabilitative services require residence at or near or travel to a
rehabilitative facility, the employer shall pay the employee’s reasonable expense for board, lodging,
and/or travel. The reasonable cost of transportation on or after July 1, 2016, is the rate equal to the
per-mile rate allowed by the Internal Revenue Service for use of a privately owned automobile for
business miles driven, as from time to time amended, for a private motor vehicle or the reasonable
cost incurred for transportation, from the employee’s point of departure, whether from the
employee’s home or place of employment, and return. Expense reimbursement requests shall be
submitted no more frequently than one per thirty (30) day period if applicable.
(e) Except for the provisions of this section, the provisions of § 28-33-8 shall remain in
LC006435 - Page 7 of 14

full force and effect.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the director shall promulgate rules and regulations
pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 for certifying rehabilitation providers, evaluators, and counselors,
and the director shall maintain a registry of those persons so certified. No plan of rehabilitation
requiring the services of a rehabilitation counselor shall be approved by the workers’ compensation
court or agreed to by the parties unless the counselor is certified by the director. Any requests for
approval of a rehabilitation plan pending before the director prior to September 1, 2000, will remain
at the department for determination. All requests after this date will be heard by the workers’
compensation court.
SECTION 3. Section 28-35-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-35 entitled "Workers’
Compensation — Procedure" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-35-5. Appeals from memorandum of agreement.
Any employer or insurer who or that has made payment to an injured employee or those
entitled to compensation on account of the death of an employee which payment has been procured
by fraud, coercion, or mutual mistake of fact; or any injured employee or those entitled to
compensation on account of the death of an employee who has been aggrieved by a memorandum
of agreement in that it: (1) Fails to correctly diagnose the injury; (2) Fails to set out correctly all
the injuries received by the injured employee, including any injuries caused by or flowing from the
original injury; (3) Fails to set out all parts of the body affected by injuries; (4) Fails to correctly
set the rate of compensation; or (5) In any other way is affected by error; upon petition to the court
setting forth all the additional facts, filed by the aggrieved party and served in the same manner as
is provided for in chapters 29 — 38 of this title, the workers’ compensation court shall hear any
and all those matters and make their decision in accordance with those chapters.
SECTION 4. Section 45-19-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-19 entitled "Relief of
Injured and Deceased Fire Fighters and Police Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-19-1. Salary payment during line of duty illness or injury.
(a)(1) Whenever any police officer of the Rhode Island airport corporation or whenever
any police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or
deputy fire marshal of any city, town, fire district, or the state of Rhode Island is wholly or partially
incapacitated by reason of injuries received or sickness contracted in the performance of their duties
or due to their rendering of emergency assistance within the physical boundaries of the state of
Rhode Island at any occurrence involving the protection or rescue of human life which necessitates
that they respond in a professional capacity when they would normally be considered by their
employer to be officially off-duty, the respective city, town, fire district, state of Rhode Island, or
LC006435 - Page 8 of 14

Rhode Island airport corporation by which the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson,
fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal, is employed, shall, during the period
of the incapacity, pay the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief
deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal, the salary or wage and benefits to which the police
officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire
marshal, would be entitled had he or she not been incapacitated, and shall pay the medical, surgical,
dental, optical, or other attendance, or treatment, nurses, and hospital services, medicines, crutches,
and apparatus for the necessary period, except that if any city, town, fire district, the state of Rhode
Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation provides the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue
crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal, with insurance coverage
for the related treatment, services, or equipment, then the city, town, fire district, the state of Rhode
Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation is only obligated to pay the difference between the
maximum amount allowable under the insurance coverage and the actual cost of the treatment,
service, or equipment. In addition, the cities, towns, fire districts, the state of Rhode Island, or
Rhode Island airport corporation shall pay all similar expenses incurred by a member who has been
placed on a disability pension and suffers a recurrence of the injury or illness that dictated his or
her disability retirement, subject to the provisions of subsection (j) herein.
(2) A police officer or firefighter diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder (as
described in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, current edition, published
by the American Psychiatric Association) by an individual who holds the title of an independent
licensed mental health professional with a master’s degree, related to the exposure of potentially
traumatic events, resulting from their acting within the course of their employment or from the
rendering of emergency assistance in the state of Rhode Island, at any occurrence involving the
protection or the rescue of human life while off-duty, as set forth in subsection (h) of this section,
shall be presumed to have sustained an injury in the line of duty, as that term is used in subsection
(a)(1) of this section, unless the contrary is proven by a fair preponderance of the evidence that the
post-traumatic stress injury/PTSD is not related to their job as a police officer or firefighter. The
benefits provided for under this section shall not be extended to a police officer or firefighter, if
their post-traumatic stress injury/PTSD diagnosis arises out of any disciplinary action, work
evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion, termination, or similar adverse job actions.
(b) As used in this section, “police officer” means and includes any chief or other member
of the police department of any city or town regularly employed at a fixed salary or wage and any
deputy sheriff, member of the fugitive task force, or capitol police officer, permanent
environmental police officer or criminal investigator of the department of environmental
LC006435 - Page 9 of 14

management, or airport police officer.
(c) As used in this section, “firefighter” means and includes any chief or other member of
the fire department or rescue personnel of any city, town, or fire district, and any person employed
as a member of the fire department of the town of North Smithfield, or fire department or district
in any city or town.
(d) As used in this section, “crash rescue crewperson” means and includes any chief or
other member of the emergency crash rescue section, division of airports, or department of
transportation of the state of Rhode Island regularly employed at a fixed salary or wage.
(e) As used in this section, “fire marshal,” “chief deputy fire marshal,” and “deputy fire
marshal” mean and include the fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, and deputy fire marshals
regularly employed by the state of Rhode Island pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.2 of title
23.
(f) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island, except for sworn employees of the
Rhode Island state police, who is otherwise entitled to the benefits of chapter 19 of this title, shall
be subject to the provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of title 28 for case management procedures and
dispute resolution by the workers’ compensation court, for all petitions filed on or after July 1,
2025, for the following benefit and disability determinations:
(1) All disputes concerning original liability on matters filed pursuant to this section.
(1)(2) The nature and status of disability of the injured employee;
(2)(3) The nature and location of injury relative to the work incident;
(3)(4) Maximum medical improvement (MMI), as it is defined under § 28-33-2(9) 28-29-
2(9);
(4)(5) All issues of legal and/or medical causation; and
(5)(6) The assignment of fees and costs pursuant to the provisions of § 28-35-32.
The court may, in its discretion, appoint an impartial medical examiner in accordance with
§ 28-33-35. The court shall hereby be empowered to enforce all of its orders, decrees, and consent
agreements of the parties.
(g) In order to receive the benefits provided for under this section, a police officer or
firefighter must prove to their employer that they had reasonable grounds to believe that there was
an emergency that required an immediate need for their assistance for the protection or rescue of
human life.
(h) Any claims to the benefits provided for under this section resulting from the rendering
of emergency assistance in the state of Rhode Island at any occurrence involving the protection or
rescue of human life while off-duty, shall first require those covered by this section to submit a
LC006435 - Page 10 of 14

sworn declaration to their employer attesting to the date, time, place, and nature of the event
involving the protection or rescue of human life causing the professional assistance to be rendered
and the cause and nature of any injuries sustained in the protection or rescue of human life. Sworn
declarations shall also be required from any available witness to the alleged emergency involving
the protection or rescue of human life.
(i) All declarations required under this section shall contain the following language:
“Under penalty of perjury, I declare and affirm that I have examined this declaration,
including any accompanying schedules and statements, and that all statements contained herein are
true and correct.”
(j) Any person, not employed by the state of Rhode Island, receiving injured-on-duty
benefits pursuant to this section, and subject to the jurisdiction of the state retirement board for
accidental retirement disability, for an injury occurring on or after July 1, 2011, shall apply for an
accidental disability retirement allowance from the state retirement board not later than the later of
eighteen (18) months after the date of the person’s injury that resulted in the person’s injured-on-
duty status or sixty (60) days from the date on which the treating physician certifies that the person
has reached maximum medical improvement. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit or alter
any and all rights of the parties with respect to independent medical examination or otherwise, as
set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement. Notwithstanding the forgoing, any
person receiving injured-on-duty benefits as the result of a static and incapacitating injury whose
permanent nature is readily obvious and ascertainable shall be required to apply for an accidental
disability retirement allowance within sixty (60) days from the date on which the treating physician
certifies that the person’s injury is permanent, or sixty (60) days from the date on which the
determination of permanency is made in accordance with the independent medical examination
procedures as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(1) If a person with injured-on-duty status fails to apply for an accidental disability
retirement allowance from the state retirement board within the time frame set forth above, that
person’s injured-on-duty payment shall terminate. Further, any person suffering a static and
incapacitating injury as set forth in subsection (j) above and who fails to apply for an accidental
disability benefit allowance as set forth in subsection (j) shall have their injured-on-duty payment
terminated.
(2) A person who so applies shall continue to receive injured-on-duty payments, and the
right to continue to receive IOD payments of a person who so applies shall terminate in the event
of a final ruling of the workers’ compensation court allowing accidental disability benefits. Nothing
herein shall be construed to limit or alter any and all rights of the parties with respect to independent
LC006435 - Page 11 of 14

medical examination or otherwise, as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(k) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island who is currently receiving injured-
on-duty benefits or any person employed by the state of Rhode Island who in the future is entitled
to injured-on-duty benefits pursuant to this chapter, and subject to the jurisdiction of the state
retirement board for accidental retirement disability, shall apply for an accidental disability
retirement allowance from the state retirement board the later of eighteen (18) months after the date
of the person’s injury that resulted in the person’s injured-on-duty status or sixty (60) days from
the date on which the treating physician certifies that the person has reached maximum medical
improvement. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit or alter any and all rights of the parties
with respect to independent medical examination or otherwise, as set forth in the applicable
collective bargaining agreement. Notwithstanding the forgoing, any person receiving injured-on-
duty benefits as the result of a static and incapacitating injury whose permanent nature is readily
obvious and ascertainable shall be required to apply for an accidental disability retirement
allowance within sixty (60) days from the date on which a treating physician or an independent
medical examiner certifies that the person’s injury is permanent, or sixty (60) days from the date
on which such determination of permanency is made in accordance with the independent medical
examination procedures as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(1) If a person employed by the state of Rhode Island with injured-on-duty status fails to
apply for an accidental disability retirement allowance from the state retirement board within the
time frame set forth in subsection (k) above, that person’s injured-on-duty payment shall terminate.
Further, any person employed by the state of Rhode Island suffering a static and incapacitating
injury as set forth in subsection (k) above and who fails to apply for an accidental disability benefit
allowance as set forth in subsection (k) shall have his or her injured-on-duty payment terminated.
(2) A person employed by the state of Rhode Island who so applies shall continue to receive
injured-on-duty payments, and the right to continue to receive injured-on-duty payments of a
person who so applies shall terminate upon final adjudication by the state retirement board
approving or denying either ordinary or accidental disability payments and, notwithstanding § 45-
31.2-9, this termination of injured-on-duty benefits shall not be stayed.
(3)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all persons employed by the state of
Rhode Island entitled to benefits under this section who were injured prior to July 1, 2019, and who
have been receiving injured-on-duty benefits pursuant to this section for a period of eighteen (18)
months or longer as of July 1, 2019, shall have up to ninety (90) days from July 1, 2019, to apply
for an accidental disability retirement benefit allowance. Any person employed by the state of
Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty benefits for a period less than eighteen (18) months as of
LC006435 - Page 12 of 14

July 1, 2019, shall apply for an accidental disability retirement benefit allowance within eighteen
(18) months of the date of injury that resulted in the person receiving injured-on-duty pay; provided
however, said person shall have a minimum of ninety (90) days to apply.
Applications for disability retirement received by the state retirement board by any person
employed by the State of Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty payments that shall be deemed
untimely pursuant to § 36-10-14(b) shall have ninety (90) days from July 1, 2019, to apply for an
accidental disability retirement benefit allowance. Failure to apply for an accidental disability
retirement benefit allowance within the timeframe set forth herein shall result in the termination of
injured-on-duty benefits.
(ii) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty payments
who has been issued a final adjudication of the state retirement board on an application for an
ordinary or accidental disability benefit, either approving or denying the application, shall have his
or her injured-on-duty payments terminated.
(4) If awarded an accidental disability pension, any person employed by the state of Rhode
Island covered under this section shall receive benefits consistent with § 36-10-15.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006435
========
LC006435 - Page 13 of 14